Washington statutes.
RCW 33.46.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(1) "Association" means any association organized under the laws of this state or the laws of the United States of America;

(2) "Director" means a member of the board of directors of an association, savings bank, or commercial bank, as applicable;

(3) "Bank" means a savings bank or commercial bank organized under the laws of this state; and

(4) "Trustee" means a member of the managing board of a mutual savings bank.

[ 1982 c 3 s 80; 1975 1st ex.s. c 83 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.